Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Chapter 7 Community Development, and Science, Technology and Energy,Authorities

Community development provisions constitutional. —

This chapter does not violate art. 16, § 6, Wyo. Const., on the ground that it constitutes lending of the public credit for a private purpose provided no debt is created in the state beyond the current year's taxes. Any private benefit is purely incidental and not within constitutional prohibitions. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Section 10, ch. 202, Laws 1975, which appropriates funds for the administration of the Wyoming community development authority, does not violate art. 3, § 34, Wyo. Const., on the ground that the section is not related to the ordinary expenses of the legislative, executive and judicial departments of the state, and should be enacted by a separate bill embracing one subject, since there is no constitutional limitation on the creation of a separate body corporate, as a state instrumentality, to perform governmental functions having a public purpose. With that right goes the implied authority to lend financial support for purely administrative purposes. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).